Connecticut, session 2026, SB00471.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
1 Section 1. Section 31-53 of the 2026 supplement to the general statutes
2 is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective
3 January 1, 2027):
4 (a) Each contract for the construction, remodeling, refinishing,
5 refurbishing, rehabilitation, alteration or repair of any public works
6 project by the state or any of its agents, or by any political subdivision
7 of the state or any of its agents, including, on and after July 1, 2025, each
8 contract for off-site custom fabrication for any such public works
9 project, shall contain the following provision: "The wages paid on an
10 hourly basis to any person performing the work of any mechanic,
11 laborer or worker on the work herein contracted to be done and the
12 amount of payment or contribution paid or payable on behalf of each
13 such person to any employee welfare fund, [as defined in subsection (i)
14 of this section,] shall be at a rate equal to the rate customary or
15 prevailing for the same work in the same trade or occupation in the town
16 in which such public works project is being constructed. Any contractor
17 who is not obligated by agreement to make payment or contribution on
18 behalf of such persons to any such employee welfare fund shall pay to
19 each mechanic, laborer or worker as part of such person's wages the
LCO 1 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
20 amount of payment or contribution for such person's classification on
21 each pay day." For purposes of this subsection, "off-site custom
22 fabrication" means the fabrication of mechanical systems that are
23 fabricated at a site located within the state other than the location of a
24 public works project, but are fabricated specifically for such public
25 works project, including plumbing systems, heating systems, cooling
26 systems, pipefitting systems, ventilation systems or exhaust duct
27 systems. "Off-site custom fabrication" does not include components or
28 materials that are stock shelf items or readily available.
29 (b) If the commissioner, upon inspection or investigation of a
30 complaint, believes that a contractor or subcontractor has knowingly or
31 wilfully employed any mechanic, laborer or worker in the construction,
32 remodeling, refinishing, refurbishing, rehabilitation, alteration or repair
33 of any public works project for or on behalf of the state or any of its
34 agents, or any political subdivision of the state or any of its agents, at a
35 rate of wage on an hourly basis that is less than the rate customary or
36 prevailing for the same work in the same trade or occupation in the town
37 in which such public works project is being constructed, remodeled,
38 refinished, refurbished, rehabilitated, altered or repaired, or who has
39 failed to pay the amount of payment or contributions paid or payable
40 on behalf of each such person to any employee welfare fund, or in lieu
41 thereof to the person, as provided by subsection (a) of this section, such
42 contractor or subcontractor shall be issued a citation and may be fined
43 five thousand dollars for each offense. The commissioner shall maintain
44 a list of any contractor or subcontractor that, during the three preceding
45 calendar years, violates this section or enters into a settlement with the
46 commissioner to resolve any claim brought by the commissioner
47 pursuant to this section. For each contractor or subcontractor placed on
48 such list, the commissioner shall record the following information: (1)
49 The nature of the violation; (2) the total amount of wages and fringe
50 benefits making up the violation or agreed upon in any settlement with
51 the commissioner; and (3) the total amount of civil penalties and fines
52 agreed upon by the commissioner. The commissioner shall review the
53 list on the first day of May each year for the preceding rolling three-year
LCO 2 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
54 period and may refer for debarment any contractor or subcontractor that
55 committed a violation of this section during the rolling three-year
56 period. The commissioner shall refer for debarment any contractor or
57 subcontractor that entered into one or more settlement agreements with
58 the commissioner where the sum total of all settlements within such
59 period exceeds fifty thousand dollars in back wages or fringe benefits,
60 or entered into one or more settlement agreements with the
61 commissioner where the sum total of all settlements within such period
62 exceeds fifty thousand dollars in civil penalties or fines agreed upon by
63 the commissioner. Any contractor or subcontractor the commissioner
64 refers for debarment may request a hearing before the commissioner.
65 Such hearing shall be conducted in accordance with the provisions of
66 chapter 54. In addition, if it is found by the contracting officer
67 representing the state or political subdivision of the state that any
68 mechanic, laborer or worker employed by the contractor or any
69 subcontractor directly on the site for the work covered by the contract
70 has been or is being paid a rate of wages less than the rate of wages
71 required by the contract to be paid as required by this section, the state
72 or contracting political subdivision of the state may (A) by written or
73 electronic notice to the contractor, terminate such contractor's right to
74 proceed with the work or such part of the work as to which there has
75 been a failure to pay said required wages and to prosecute the work to
76 completion by contract or otherwise, and the contractor and the
77 contractor's sureties shall be liable to the state or the contracting political
78 subdivision for any excess costs occasioned the state or the contracting
79 political subdivision thereby, or (B) withhold payment of money to the
80 contractor or subcontractor. The contracting department of the state or
81 the political subdivision of the state shall, not later than two days after
82 taking such action, notify the Labor Commissioner, in writing or
83 electronically, of the name of the contractor or subcontractor, the project
84 involved, the location of the work, the violations involved, the date the
85 contract was terminated, and steps taken to collect the required wages.
86 (c) The Labor Commissioner may make complaint to the proper
87 prosecuting authorities for the violation of any provision of subsection
LCO 3 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
88 (b) of this section.
89 (d) For the purpose of predetermining the prevailing rate of wage on
90 an hourly basis and the amount of payment, contributions and member
91 benefits paid or payable on behalf of each person to any employee
92 welfare fund [, as defined in subsection (i) of this section,] in each town
93 where such contract is to be performed, the Labor Commissioner shall
94 adopt the rate of wages on an hourly basis in accordance with the
95 provisions of this section and section 31-76c, and the amount, at the
96 journeyman rate, of payment, contributions and member benefits,
97 including health, pension, annuity and apprenticeship funds, as
98 recognized by the United States Department of Labor and the Labor
99 Commissioner paid or payable on behalf of each person to any
100 employee welfare fund, [as defined in subsection (i) of this section,] as
101 established in the collective bargaining agreements or understandings
102 between employers or employer associations and bona fide labor
103 organizations for the same work in the same trade or occupation in the
104 town in which the applicable public works project, as defined in section
105 31-56a, is being constructed. For each trade or occupation for which
106 more than one collective bargaining agreement is in effect for the town
107 in which such project is being constructed, the collective bargaining
108 agreement of historical jurisdiction shall prevail. For each trade or
109 occupation for which there is no collective bargaining agreement in
110 effect for the town in which the public works project is being
111 constructed, the Labor Commissioner shall adopt and use such
112 appropriate and applicable prevailing wage rate determinations as have
113 been made by the Secretary of Labor of the United States under the
114 provisions of the Davis-Bacon Act, as amended.
115 (e) The Labor Commissioner shall determine the prevailing rate of
116 wages on an hourly basis and the amount of payment or contributions
117 paid or payable on behalf of such person to any employee welfare fund
118 [, as defined in subsection (i) of this section,] in each locality where any
119 such public work is to be constructed, and the agent empowered to let
120 such contract shall contact the Labor Commissioner, at least ten but not
121 more than twenty days prior to the date such contracts will be
LCO 4 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
122 advertised for bid, to ascertain the proper rate of wages and amount of
123 employee welfare fund payments or contributions and shall include
124 such rate of wage on an hourly basis and the amount of payment or
125 contributions paid or payable on behalf of each person to any employee
126 welfare fund, [as defined in subsection (i) of this section,] or in lieu
127 thereof the amount to be paid directly to each person for such payment
128 or contributions as provided in subsection (a) of this section for all
129 classifications of labor in the proposal for the contract. The rate of wage
130 on an hourly basis and the amount of payment or contributions to any
131 employee welfare fund [, as defined in subsection (i) of this section,] or
132 cash in lieu thereof, as provided in subsection (a) of this section, shall, at
133 all times, be considered as the minimum rate for the classification for
134 which it was established. Prior to the award of any contract, purchase
135 order, bid package or other designation subject to the provisions of this
136 section, such agent shall certify to the Labor Commissioner, either in
137 writing or electronically, the total dollar amount of work to be done in
138 connection with such public works project, regardless of whether such
139 project consists of one or more contracts. Upon the award of any
140 contract subject to the provisions of this section, the contractor to whom
141 such contract is awarded shall certify, under oath, to the Labor
142 Commissioner the pay scale to be used by such contractor and any of
143 the contractor's subcontractors for work to be performed under such
144 contract.
145 (f) Each employer subject to the provisions of this section, section 31-
146 53c, as amended by this act, subsection (f) of section 31-53d or section
147 31-54 shall (1) keep, maintain and preserve such records relating to the
148 wages and hours worked by each person performing the work of any
149 mechanic, laborer and worker and a schedule of the occupation or work
150 classification at which each person performing the work of any
151 mechanic, laborer or worker on the project is employed during each
152 work day and week in such manner and form as the Labor
153 Commissioner establishes to assure the proper payments due to such
154 persons or employee welfare funds under this section, section 31-53c, as
155 amended by this act, subsection (f) of section 31-53d or section 31-54,
LCO 5 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
156 regardless of any contractual relationship alleged to exist between the
157 contractor and such person, provided such employer shall have the
158 option of keeping, maintaining and preserving such records in an
159 electronic format, and (2) submit monthly to the contracting agency or
160 the Department of Economic and Community Development pursuant
161 to section 31-53c, as amended by this act, or to the developer of a covered
162 project, as defined in section 31-53d, as applicable, by mail, electronic
163 mail or other method accepted by such agency, the Department of
164 Economic and Community Development or such developer, a certified
165 payroll that shall consist of a complete copy of such records
166 accompanied by a statement signed by the employer that indicates (A)
167 such records are correct; (B) the rate of wages paid to each person
168 performing the work of any mechanic, laborer or worker and the
169 amount of payment or contributions paid or payable on behalf of each
170 such person to any employee welfare fund [, as defined in subsection (i)
171 of this section,] are not less than the prevailing rate of wages and the
172 amount of payment or contributions paid or payable on behalf of each
173 such person to any employee welfare fund, as determined by the Labor
174 Commissioner pursuant to subsection (d) of this section, and not less
175 than those required by the contract to be paid; (C) the employer has
176 complied with the applicable provisions of this section, section 31-53c,
177 as amended by this act, subsection (f) of section 31-53d and section 31-
178 54; (D) each such person is covered by a workers' compensation
179 insurance policy for the duration of such person's employment, which
180 shall be demonstrated by submitting to the contracting agency the name
181 of the workers' compensation insurance carrier covering each such
182 person, the effective and expiration dates of each policy and each policy
183 number; (E) the employer does not receive kickbacks, as defined in 41
184 USC 52, from any employee or employee welfare fund; and (F) pursuant
185 to the provisions of section 53a-157a, the employer is aware that filing a
186 certified payroll which the employer knows to be false is a class D felony
187 for which the employer may be fined up to five thousand dollars,
188 imprisoned for up to five years, or both. This subsection shall not be
189 construed to prohibit a general contractor from relying on the
190 certification of a lower tier subcontractor, provided the general
LCO 6 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
191 contractor shall not be exempted from the provisions of section 53a-157a
192 if the general contractor knowingly relies upon a subcontractor's false
193 certification. Notwithstanding the provisions of section 1-210, the
194 certified payroll shall be considered a public record and every person
195 shall have the right to inspect and copy such records in accordance with
196 the provisions of section 1-212. The provisions of subsections (a) and (b)
197 of section 31-59 and sections 31-66 and 31-69 that are not inconsistent
198 with the provisions of this section, section 31-53c, as amended by this
199 act, or 31-54 apply to this section. Failing to file a certified payroll
200 pursuant to subdivision (2) of this subsection is a class D felony for
201 which the employer may be fined up to five thousand dollars,
202 imprisoned for up to five years, or both.
203 (g) Any contractor who is required by the Labor Department to make
204 any payment as a result of a subcontractor's failure to pay wages or
205 benefits, or any subcontractor who is required by the Labor Department
206 to make any payment as a result of a lower tier subcontractor's failure
207 to pay wages or benefits, may bring a civil action in the Superior Court
208 to recover no more than the damages sustained by reason of making
209 such payment, together with costs and a reasonable attorney's fee.
210 (h) (1) For any public works contract, as defined in section 46a-68b,
211 entered into or renewed on or after January 1, 2027, where the total cost
212 of construction on a public works project exceeds ten million dollars, the
213 total on-site hours worked by employees who are subject to the
214 provisions of this section, by trade or occupation, who are paid an
215 hourly wage and directly employed by a contractor or subcontractor,
216 shall include work performed by apprentices meeting the requirements
217 of subdivision (3) of this subsection, in a percentage not less than as
218 required by subdivision (5) of this subsection.
219 (2) The requirements of this section shall apply separately to each
220 contractor or subcontractor employing employees in an apprenticeable
221 trade who are performing work pursuant to a public works contract and
222 shall not be applied on an aggregate or project-wide basis.
LCO 7 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
223 (3) Apprentices performing work under this subsection shall be
224 enrolled in bona fide apprenticeship programs which have had at least
225 one apprentice complete the program within the preceding five years
226 and that are (A) registered with and approved by the Labor
227 Department's office of apprenticeship training; or (B) registered with
228 and approved by the United States Department of Labor.
229 (4) Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to require that an
230 apprenticeship program qualify as an employee welfare benefit plan
231 under the Employee Retirement Income Security Act of 1974, as
232 amended from time to time.
233 (5) The required minimum percentage of total on-site hours
234 performed by apprentices pursuant to a public works contract pursuant
235 to this subsection shall be phased in as follows:
236 (A) One year after January 1, 2027: Five per cent;
237 (B) Two years after January 1, 2027: Ten per cent; and
238 (C) Three years after January 1, 2027: Fifteen per cent.
239 (6) All use of apprentices under this subsection shall be in accordance
240 with all applicable apprentice-to-journeyperson ratios established by
241 state or federal law.
242 (7) The Labor Commissioner may grant a limited waiver of the
243 requirements of this subsection upon making a finding, in writing, that
244 no responsible and qualified bidder maintaining or participating in an
245 apprenticeship program is reasonably available for a specific trade or
246 scope of work. Any such waiver shall be limited to such trade or scope
247 and shall not apply to the entire public works project unless the
248 commissioner makes a written finding for each affected trade. All
249 documentation of any such waivers granted shall be retained as part of
250 the public record for the contract.
251 (8) Any construction manager, general contractor or subcontractor
252 for a public works contract subject to the provisions of this subsection
LCO 8 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
253 who fails to maintain or participate in a bona fide apprenticeship
254 program and who is not otherwise exempt pursuant to a waiver granted
255 under subdivision (7) of this subsection, shall not be deemed a
256 responsible and qualified bidder.
257 (9) The Labor Commissioner may adopt regulations, in accordance
258 with the provisions of chapter 54, to implement the provisions of this
259 subsection.
260 [(h) (1)] (i) The provisions of this section shall not apply where [(A)]
261 (1) the combined total cost or total bond authorization for all work to be
262 performed by all contractors and subcontractors in connection with new
263 construction of any public works project is less than one million dollars,
264 or [(B)] (2) the combined total cost of all work to be performed by all
265 contractors and subcontractors in connection with any remodeling,
266 refinishing, refurbishing, rehabilitation, alteration or repair of any
267 public works project is less than one hundred thousand dollars.
268 [(2) On and after October 31, 2017, and prior to July 1, 2019, the
269 provisions of this subdivision shall not apply where the work to be
270 performed by any contractor or subcontractor in connection with new
271 construction, remodeling, refinishing, refurbishing, rehabilitation,
272 alteration or repair of any public works project funded in whole or in
273 part by any private bequest that is greater than nine million dollars but
274 less than twelve million dollars for a municipality in New Haven
275 County with a population of not less than twelve thousand and not
276 more than thirteen thousand, as determined by the most recent
277 population estimate by the Department of Public Health.
278 (3) On and after July 1, 2019, and prior to January 1, 2020, the
279 provisions of this subdivision shall not apply where the work to be
280 performed by any contractor or subcontractor in connection with new
281 construction, remodeling, refinishing, refurbishing, rehabilitation,
282 alteration or repair of any public works project funded in whole or in
283 part by any private bequest that is greater than nine million dollars but
284 less than twenty-two million dollars for a municipality in New Haven
LCO 9 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
285 County with a population of not less than twelve thousand and not
286 more than thirteen thousand, as determined by the most recent
287 population estimate by the Department of Public Health.]
288 [(i)] (j) As used in this section and sections 31-53c, as amended by this
289 act, and 31-54, (1) "employee welfare fund" means any trust fund
290 established by one or more employers and one or more labor
291 organizations or one or more other third parties not affiliated with the
292 employers to provide from moneys in the fund, whether through the
293 purchase of insurance or annuity contracts or otherwise, benefits under
294 an employee welfare plan; provided such term [shall] does not include
295 any such fund where the trustee, or all of the trustees, are subject to
296 supervision by the Banking Commissioner of this state or any other state
297 or the Comptroller of the Currency of the United States or the Board of
298 Governors of the Federal Reserve System, and (2) "benefits under an
299 employee welfare plan" means one or more benefits or services under
300 any plan established or maintained for persons performing the work of
301 any mechanics, laborers or workers or their families or dependents, or
302 for both, including, but not limited to, medical, surgical or hospital care
303 benefits; benefits in the event of sickness, accident, disability or death;
304 benefits in the event of unemployment, or retirement benefits.
305 Sec. 2. (NEW) (Effective January 1, 2027) (a) Any contractor or
306 subcontractor who fails to comply with the requirements concerning
307 usage of apprentices in subsection (h) of section 31-53 of the general
308 statutes, as amended by this act, shall be subject to a civil penalty
309 assessed by the Labor Commissioner. Such civil penalty shall be
310 calculated based on the number of apprentice hours required but not
311 performed under a public works contract, as defined in section 46a-68b
312 of the general statutes, but shall not exceed two hundred dollars per
313 hour of noncompliance. In determining whether to assess a penalty
314 under this section, the commissioner shall consider whether the
315 contractor or subcontractor made a good faith effort to comply with
316 such requirements concerning usage of apprentices, including any
317 documentation of efforts to obtain apprentices from approved
318 programs.
LCO 10 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
319 (b) Any civil penalty collected pursuant to this section shall be
320 deposited into a workforce training or apprenticeship related account,
321 as determined by the Labor Commissioner, for the purpose of
322 supporting registered apprenticeship programs.
323 (c) The Department of Administrative Services, or any other
324 awarding authority, as defined in section 4b-91 of the general statutes,
325 may withhold payment under a public works contract until either the
326 contractor or subcontractor complies with the requirements of
327 subsection (h) of section 31-53 of the general statutes, as amended by
328 this act, or has paid any civil penalty imposed under this section.
329 (d) Any contractor or subcontractor found to have wilfully or
330 repeatedly violated the requirements concerning usage of apprentices
331 in subsection (h) of section 31-53 of the general statutes, as amended by
332 this act, may, in addition to any civil penalty, be subject to a temporary
333 disqualification from bidding on public works contracts for a period not
334 exceeding one year.
335 Sec. 3. Subsection (d) of section 10a-109n of the 2026 supplement to
336 the general statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu
337 thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
338 (d) For the purposes of part III of chapter 557, a project undertaken
339 by the university shall be deemed to be a state public works project and
340 consist of public buildings. For purposes of subsection (h) of section 31-
341 53, as amended by this act, any project undertaken by the university
342 exceeding ten million dollars shall require contractors and
343 subcontractors to comply with the requirements of said subsection.
344 Sec. 4. Section 10a-153 of the general statutes is repealed and the
345 following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
346 The constituent units of the state system of higher education shall
347 comply with (1) the provisions of section 4a-60g when undertaking
348 remodeling, alteration, repair or enlargement projects pursuant to the
349 provisions of sections 4b-51, 4b-52, 4b-55 and 4b-91, and (2) the
LCO 11 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
350 provisions of subsection (h) of section 31-53, as amended by this act,
351 concerning usage of apprentices for any construction contract with a
352 value exceeding ten million dollars.
353 Sec. 5. Subdivision (7) of subsection (c) of section 4a-100 of the general
354 statutes is repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof
355 (Effective January 1, 2027):
356 (7) A statement of whether (A) the applicant has been disqualified
357 pursuant to this section, section 4b-95, [this section or section] 31-57c or
358 31-57d or section 2 of this act, (B) the applicant is disqualified or
359 prohibited from being awarded a contract pursuant to section 31-57b,
360 (C) the applicant has been disqualified by another state, (D) the
361 applicant has been disqualified by a federal agency or pursuant to
362 federal law, (E) the applicant's registration has been suspended or
363 revoked by the Department of Consumer Protection pursuant to section
364 20-341gg, (F) the applicant has been disqualified by a municipality, and
365 (G) the matters that gave rise to any such disqualification, suspension or
366 revocation have been eliminated or remedied; and
367 Sec. 6. Subsection (i) of section 4a-100 of the general statutes is
368 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
369 1, 2027):
370 (i) The commissioner may not issue or renew a prequalification
371 certificate to any contractor or substantial subcontractor (1) who is
372 disqualified pursuant to section 31-57c or 31-57d or section 2 of this act,
373 or (2) who has a principal or key personnel who, within the past five
374 years, has a conviction or has entered a plea of guilty or nolo contendere
375 for or has admitted to commission of an act or omission that reasonably
376 could have resulted in disqualification pursuant to any provision of
377 subdivisions (1) to (3), inclusive, of subsection (d) of section 31-57c, [or]
378 subdivisions (1) to (3), inclusive, of subsection (d) of section 31-57d, or
379 section 2 of this act, as determined by the commissioner.
380 Sec. 7. Subsection (a) of section 31-53b of the general statutes is
381 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
LCO 12 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
382 1, 2027):
383 (a) Each contract for a public works project entered into on or after
384 July 1, 2009, by the state or any of its agents, or by any political
385 subdivision of the state or any of its agents, described in subsection [(h)]
386 (i) of section 31-53, as amended by this act, shall contain a provision
387 requiring that each contractor furnish proof with the weekly certified
388 payroll form for the first week each employee begins work on such
389 project that any person performing the work of a mechanic, laborer or
390 worker pursuant to the classifications of labor under section 31-53, as
391 amended by this act, on such public works project, pursuant to such
392 contract, has completed a course of at least ten hours in duration in
393 construction safety and health approved by the federal Occupational
394 Safety and Health Administration or, has completed a new miner
395 training program approved by the Federal Mine Safety and Health
396 Administration in accordance with 30 CFR 46 or, in the case of
397 telecommunications employees, has completed at least ten hours of
398 training in accordance with 29 CFR 1910.268, and, on or after July 1,
399 2012, that any plumber or electrician subject to the continuing education
400 requirements of section 20-334d, who has completed a course of at least
401 ten hours in duration in construction safety and health approved by the
402 federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration five or more
403 years prior to the date such electrician or plumber begins work on such
404 public works project, has completed a supplemental refresher training
405 course of at least four hours in duration in construction safety and health
406 taught by a federal Occupational Safety and Health Administration
407 authorized trainer.
408 Sec. 8. Subsections (b) to (e), inclusive, of section 31-53c of the 2026
409 supplement to the general statutes are repealed and the following is
410 substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January 1, 2027):
411 (b) On and after July 1, 2018, if the Department of Economic and
412 Community Development provides financial assistance to any business
413 organization for any construction project of such business organization,
414 the Department of Economic and Community Development shall
LCO 13 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
415 require, as a condition of providing such financial assistance, that any
416 contract entered into by the business organization for such project shall
417 contain the following provision: "The wages paid on an hourly basis to
418 any person performing the work of any mechanic, laborer or worker on
419 the work herein contracted to be done and the amount of payment or
420 contribution paid or payable on behalf of each such person to any
421 employee welfare fund, as defined in [subsection (i) of] section 31-53, as
422 amended by this act, shall be at a rate equal to the rate customary or
423 prevailing for the same work in the same trade or occupation in the town
424 in which such construction, remodeling, refinishing, refurbishing,
425 rehabilitation, alteration or repair project is being undertaken. Any
426 contractor who is not obligated by agreement to make payment or
427 contribution on behalf of such persons to any such employee welfare
428 fund shall pay to each mechanic, laborer or worker as part of such
429 person's wages the amount of payment or contribution for such person's
430 classification on each pay day."
431 (c) Any contractor or subcontractor who knowingly or wilfully
432 employs any mechanic, laborer or worker in any project receiving
433 financial assistance from the Department of Economic and Community
434 Development for such project, at a rate of wage on an hourly basis that
435 is less than the rate customary or prevailing for the same work in the
436 same trade or occupation in the town in which such project is located,
437 or who fails to pay the amount of payment or contributions paid or
438 payable on behalf of each such person to any employee welfare fund, as
439 defined in [subsection (i) of] section 31-53, as amended by this act, or in
440 lieu thereof to the person, as provided by subsection (b) of this section,
441 shall be fined not less than two thousand five hundred dollars but not
442 more than five thousand dollars for each offense and (1) for the first
443 violation, shall be disqualified from bidding on contracts for projects for
444 which the Department of Economic and Community Development
445 provides financial assistance until the contractor or subcontractor has
446 made full restitution of the back wages owed to such persons and for an
447 additional six months thereafter, and (2) for subsequent violations, shall
448 be disqualified from bidding on contracts for projects for which the
LCO 14 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
449 Department of Economic and Community Development provides
450 financial assistance until the contractor or subcontractor has made full
451 restitution of the back wages owed to such persons and for not less than
452 an additional two years thereafter. In addition, if it is found by the
453 contracting officer representing the business organization that any
454 mechanic, laborer or worker employed by the contractor or any
455 subcontractor directly on the site for the work covered by the contract
456 has been or is being paid a rate of wages less than the rate of wages
457 required by the contract to be paid as required by this section, the
458 business organization may (A) by written or electronic notice to the
459 contractor, terminate such contractor's right to proceed with the work
460 or such part of the work as to which there has been a failure to pay said
461 required wages and to prosecute the work to completion by contract or
462 otherwise, and the contractor and the contractor's sureties shall be liable
463 to the business organization for any excess costs occasioned the business
464 organization thereby, or (B) withhold payment of money to the
465 contractor or subcontractor. The contracting business organization shall,
466 not later than two days after taking such action, notify the Labor
467 Commissioner, in writing or electronically, of the name of the contractor
468 or subcontractor, the project involved, the location of the work, the
469 violations involved, the date the contract was terminated and steps
470 taken to collect the required wages.
471 (d) The Labor Commissioner may make complaint to the proper
472 prosecuting authorities for the violation of any provision of subsection
473 (c) of this section.
474 (e) The Labor Commissioner shall predetermine the prevailing rate
475 and the amount of payment or contributions paid or payable on behalf
476 of each person to any employee welfare fund, as defined in [subsection
477 (i) of] section 31-53, as amended by this act, in each town where such
478 contract is to be performed, in the same manner as provided in
479 subsection (d) of section 31-53, as amended by this act.
480 Sec. 9. Subsection (a) of section 31-76o of the general statutes is
481 repealed and the following is substituted in lieu thereof (Effective January
LCO 15 of 16

Substitute Bill No. 471
482 1, 2027):
483 (a) For the purposes of this section, "employee welfare fund" has the
484 same meaning as provided in [subsection (i) of] section 31-53, as
485 amended by this act.
This act shall take effect as follows and shall amend the following
sections:
Section 1 January 1, 2027 31-53
Sec. 2 January 1, 2027 New section
Sec. 3 January 1, 2027 10a-109n(d)
Sec. 4 January 1, 2027 10a-153
Sec. 5 January 1, 2027 4a-100(c)(7)
Sec. 6 January 1, 2027 4a-100(i)
Sec. 7 January 1, 2027 31-53b(a)
Sec. 8 January 1, 2027 31-53c(b) to (e)
Sec. 9 January 1, 2027 31-76o(a)
GAE Joint Favorable Subst.
LCO 16 of 16